src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjective
addne+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:adºdne JUHKKE ; !
anedahtte:anedahtºte SÁVADAHTTE ;
arealaddne+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:are^al#adºdne JUHKKE ; !
arealaddne+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:are^ál#adºdne JUHKKE ; !
baldedahtte+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:baldedahtºte SÁVADAHTTE ; !
balldalahtte+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:balldalahtºte SÁVADAHTTE ; !
baládahtte:baládahtºte SÁVADAHTTE ; 
basske:bassk GALLJE ;
bieggá:biegºgá HÁVSSKE ;
binná:binºná NUORRA ;
buogŋe:buogŋe GIEVRRA ;
buorre+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:buorre NUORRA ; !
bårådahtte:bårådahtºte SÁVADAHTTE ;
dajdda+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dajdda GIEVRRA ; !
demænnta:demænnta NUORRA ; ! ! ^LOAN
doajvodahtte:doajvodahtºte SÁVADAHTTE ;
duhtadahtte+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:duhtadahtºte SÁVADAHTTE ; !
duohta:duohta NUORRA ;
dádjadahtte+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dádjadahtºte SÁVADAHTTE ; !
dájgge:dájgge GIEVRRA ;
dåhkkidahtte+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dåhkkidahtºte SÁVADAHTTE ; !
friddja+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:fridºdja NUORRA ; !
frisska+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:frisºska NUORRA ; !
gallje:gallj GALLJE ;
giehppe+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:giehppe GIEVRRA ; ! With attr same as Kintel (giehpes)
giellá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gielºlá HÁVSSKE ; !
goammbá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:goamºmbá HÁVSSKE ; !
goanntsá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:goanºntsá GIEVRRA ; !
goansstá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:goansºstá HÁVSSKE ; !
goavggá:goavgºgá HÁVSSKE ;
grehka:grehka NUORRA ;
guhkke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guhkk GALLJE ; !
guollá:guolºlá HÁVSSKE ;
guovggisruodná+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guovggis#ruodná NUORRA ; !
gáddalahtte+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:gáddalahtºte SÁVADAHTTE ; !
gárttje:gárttje GIEVRRA ;
gæŋŋga:gæŋŋga GIEVRRA ;
heva+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:heva NUORRA ; !
hielle+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hielºle HÁVSSKE ; !
hiemssidahtte:hiemssidahtºte SÁVADAHTTE ;
hálbbe:hálbbe GIEVRRA ; !XXXse álbbe
hálmmá:hálmºmá HÁVSSKE ;
hávsske:hávsske HÁVSSKE ;
håhpe:håhpe GIEVRRA ;
hærrá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hærºrá HÁVSSKE ; !
inhabijlla+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:inhabijlla NUORRA ; !
intensijvva:intensijvva NUORRA ; ! LOAN
issjá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:isºsjá GIEVRRA ; !
jieddná+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jiedºdná HÁVSSKE ; !
jugádahtte:jugádahtºte SÁVADAHTTE ;
juhkke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:juhkºke JUHKKE ; !
juorbbá:juorbºbá HÁVSSKE ;
jáhkedahtte+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jáhkedahtºte SÁVADAHTTE ; !
kråvvå:kråvvå NUORRA ;
liddná+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:lidºdná GIEVRRA ; !
lievnos:lievnos  GIEVRRA ;
luohtedahtte+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:luohtedahtºte SÁVADAHTTE ; !
lájkke+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:lájkke GIEVRRA ; !
lájtedahtte:lájtedahtºte SÁVADAHTTE ;
lågådahtte:lågådahtºte SÁVADAHTTE ;
manádahtte:manádahtºte SÁVADAHTTE ;
mielludahtte+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:mielludahtºte SÁVADAHTTE ; !
mihtodieva+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:mihto#dieva NUORRA ; !
mihá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:mihá HÁVSSKE ; !
moderáhta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:moderáhta NUORRA ; !
niddo% buorre+CmpNP/None:niddo% buorre NUORRA ; !
nievdde+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:nievdde GIEVRRA ; !
njálgge:njálgg TJÁBBE ;
njárbbe:njárbbe GIEVRRA ;
nuolbbá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:nuolbºbá HÁVSSKE ; !
nuosske+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:nuosske GIEVRRA ; !
oajvvá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:oajvºvá HÁVSSKE ; !
offensijvva:offensijvva NUORRA ; ! LOAN
riegádahtte+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:riegádahtºte SÁVADAHTTE ; !
riekta:riekta NUORRA ;
risska+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:risºska NUORRA ; !
ránndu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ránºndu HÁVSSKE ; !
sahkku+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sáhkºku HÁVSSKE ; !
senijlla+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:senijlla NUORRA ; !
siegge+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:siegge GIEVRRA ; !
signifikánnta:signifikánnta NUORRA ; ! LOAN
sjerra:sjerra GIEVRRA ;
sjuohtta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sjuohtta GIEVRRA ; !
sjáhtjalahtte:sjáhtjalahtºte SÁVADAHTTE ;
skiddá:skidºdá HÁVSSKE ;
slibrre:slibrre GIEVRRA ;
slinntso+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:slinntso GIEVRRA ; !
snivva:snivva NUORRA ; 
snjiblle+v1:snjiblle GIEVRRA ;
soajrrá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:soajrºrá HÁVSSKE ; !
stuorre+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:stuorr TJÁBBE ; !
sujbbe+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sujbbe GIEVRRA ; !
suorgganahtte:suorgganahtºte SÁVADAHTTE ;
suovvá:suovºvá HÁVSSKE ;
sávrre+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sávrre GIEVRRA ; !
sålggå:sålgºgå HÁVSSKE ;
sæjgga:sæjgga NUORRA ;
tjadádahtte:tjadádahtºte SÁVADAHTTE ;
tjuoddje:tjuodºdj TJUODDJE ;
tjuovggisvisská+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjuovggis#visská NUORRA ; !
tjábbe+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjább TJÁBBE ; !
tjáhppisruodná+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tjáhppis#ruodná NUORRA ; !
tjáhttjá:tjáhtºtjá HÁVSSKE ;
tsoahke:tsoahke GIEVRRA ;
tsuhttsá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:tsuhtºtsá HÁVSSKE ; !
uhttse+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:uhtts GALLJE ; !
unne+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:unºn GALLJE ; !
vieddje+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:viedºdje GIEVRRA ; !
viejtto:viejtto NUORRA ;
viessomguhkke:viessom#guhkk GALLJE ;
visská+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:visská NUORRA ; !
vuohttje+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuohtºtje JUHKKE ; !
vuojedahtte+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuojedahtºte SÁVADAHTTE ; !
vuoppsá:vuopºpsá HÁVSSKE ;
válljidahtte:válljidahtºte SÁVADAHTTE ;
válmmá+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:válmºmá HÁVSSKE ; !
álkke:álkºke HÁVSSKE ;
årodahtte:årodahtºte SÁVADAHTTE ;
